sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Sekery: Ťažné drevorubačské sekery; Sekerky; Štiepacie sekery
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Fejszék: Döntőfejsze; Fejszék; Hasítófejszék
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Haches: Haches d’abattage; Hachettes; Haches de fendage
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Økser: Fældeøkser; Håndøkser; Splitterøkser
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 斧: 伐木斧; 小斧; 劈木斧
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Baltalar: Devirme Baltaları; Nacaklar; Ayırma Baltaları
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Topoare: Topoare pentru tăiat copaci; Securi; Topoare pentru despicat
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Τσεκούρια: Τσεκούρια υλοτομίας; Μικρά τσεκούρια; Τσεκούρια σχισίματος
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Machados: Machados de derrubada; Machadinhas; Machados de divisão
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > ขวาน: ขวานโค่นต้นไม้; ขวานสั้น; ขวานแยกไม้
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 斧子: 伐木斧; 短柄斧; 劈斧
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Asce: Asce per abbattimento; Accette; Assi per spaccature
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Sekery: Kácecí sekery; Tesařské sekery; Štípací sekery
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > 斧: フェリングアックス; 手斧; スプリッティングアックス
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Äxte: Fälläxte; Beile; Spaltäxte
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Machados: Machados de corte; Machadinhas; Machados de divisão
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Kirveet: Puunkaatokirveet; Pienet kirveet; Halkaisukirveet
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Kirviai: Medkirčių kirviai; Kirvukai; Skaldymo kirviai
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 도끼: 벌목용 도끼; 손도끼; 장작용 도끼
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Топоры: Валочные топоры; Небольшие топоры; Колуны
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Брадви: Брадви за сечене; Малки брадви; Разделителни брадви
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Yxor: Avverkningsyxor; Handyxor; Klyvningsyxor
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Økser: Fellingsøkser; Økser; Delingsøkser
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Sjekire: Sjekire za rušenje stabala; Sjekirice; Sjekire za cijepanje
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Rìu: Rìu chặt cây; Rìu nhỏ; Rìu chẻ
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Bijlen: Velbijlen; Hakbijlen; Splijtbijlen
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Hachas: Hachas de tala; Hachas; Hachas de división
en: Hardware > Tools > Axes: Felling Axes; Hatchets; Splitting Axes
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Siekiery: Siekiery do ścinania drzew; Toporki; Siekiery do rozłupywania
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Sekire: Sekire za sečnjo; Sekirice; Cepilne sekire